California, session 20252026, AB619.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 14426 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:14426. (a) The Department of Forestry and Fire Protection and the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall jointly evaluate the Ventura Training Center. The evaluation shall include, but shall not be limited to, an evaluation of all of the following: (1) How to streamline the enrollment of formerly incarcerated individuals into the program after their successful participation in the California Conservation Camp program.(2) Ways to increase the rate of graduated trainees entering the firefighter workforce.(3) The feasibility of establishing one or more centers in other regions of the state.(b) (1) The departments shall prepare a report describing the evaluation conducted pursuant to subdivision (a) and submit the report, by January 1, 2026, to the Senate Committee on Public Safety, the Assembly Committee on Public Safety, the Senate Committee on Organization, and the Assembly Committee on Emergency Management.(2) (A) A report to be submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.(B) Pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, this section is repealed on January 1, 2030.SEC. 2. This act is an urgency statute necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety within the meaning of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall go into immediate effect. The facts constituting the necessity are:In order to address the shortage of firefighters occurring while there is an increasing number of catastrophic fires in California, it is necessary that this act take effect immediately.